District of Columbia statutes.
34-1203

Repealed

Establishment of the District of Columbia Cable Television Advisory Committee.

Repealed.

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 4, 29 DCR 2872
Oct. 22, 1983, D.C. Law 5-36, § 2(j), 30 DCR 4289
Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-159, § 16(a), 32 DCR 30
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-210, § 2(c), 43 DCR 4702
Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 3, 49 DCR 7334